Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding ORS  341.522 (6), the Office of Student Access and Com-
pletion may award a total amount in grants under ORS 341.522 that exceeds $10  million per
fiscal year during the biennium ending on June 30, 2017.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law, the General Fund appropriation made to the
Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 4, chapter 697, Oregon Laws 2015,  for
the creation and implementation of the Oregon Promise program is increased by $3,556,302.
SECTION 3. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate March 9, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House March 27, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 55 (SB 55-B) Page 1